Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4609
Nature of authority created by agreement.

(a) An agreement under sections 43-4608 to 43-4612 is temporary and terminates pursuant to sections 43-4624 to 43-4627 after the deploying parent returns from deployment, unless the agreement has been terminated before that time by court order or modification under section 43-4610. The agreement does not create an independent, continuing right to caretaking authority, decisionmaking authority, or limited contact in an individual to whom custodial responsibility is given.

(b) A nonparent who has caretaking authority, decisionmaking authority, or limited contact by an agreement under sections 43-4608 to 43-4612 has standing to enforce the agreement until it has been terminated by court order, by modification under section 43-4610, or under sections 43-4624 to 43-4627.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 9.